Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-562
Legislative findings and declarations.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that Alzheimer's and other dementia are of significant concern to the State of Nebraska, and that the Legislature and the state would benefit from a more coordinated approach to addressing Alzheimer's disease and other dementia.

Laws 2022, LB752, § 31.